Utah statutes.
31A-22-1006.   Insurer's constructive knowledge.
Every workers' compensation policy or contract shall contain a provision that,
as between the employee and the insurer, notice to or knowledge of the
occurrence of the injury on the part of the employer is considered to be
notice or knowledge to the insurer.  This provision shall also state that the
insurer is bound by and subject to the orders, findings, decisions, and awards
rendered against the employer for the payment of compensation on account of
compensable accidental injuries or occupational disease disability.
